North Dakota statutes. TITLE 49 Public Utilities
CHAPTER 49-22 Energy Conversion and Transmission
Facility Siting Act

49-22-01.
Short title. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 436, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 328, § 27, effective July 1, 2017.

49-22-02.
Statement of policy.

The legislative assembly finds that the construction of energy conversion facilities and transmission facilities affects the environment and the welfare of the citizens of this state. Therefore, it is necessary to ensure that the location, construction, and operation of energy conversion facilities and transmission facilities will produce minimal adverse effects on the environment and upon the welfare of the citizens of this state by providing that no energy conversion facility or transmission facility shall be located, constructed, and operated within this state without a certificate of site compatibility or a route permit acquired pursuant to this chapter. The legislative assembly hereby declares it to be the policy of this state to site energy conversion facilities and to route transmission facilities in an orderly manner compatible with environmental preservation and the efficient use of resources. In accordance with this policy, sites and routes shall be chosen which minimize adverse human and environmental impact while ensuring continuing system reliability and integrity and ensuring that energy needs are met and fulfilled in an orderly and timely fashion.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 436, § 2; 1979, ch. 504, § 1.

49-22-03.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context or subject matter otherwise requires:

“Certificate” means the certificate of site compatibility or the certificate of corridor compatibility issued under this chapter.

“Commission” means the North Dakota public service commission.

“Construction” includes a clearing of land, excavation, or other action affecting the environment of the site after April 9, 1975, but does not include activities:

Conducted wholly within the geographic location for which a utility has previously obtained a certificate or permit under this chapter, or on which a facility was constructed before April 9, 1975, if:

The activities are for the construction of the same type of facility as the existing type of facility as identified in a subdivision of subsection 5 or 6 or in subsection 13 of this section and the activities are:

Within the geographic boundaries of a previously issued certificate or permit;

For an electric energy conversion facility constructed before April 9, 1975, within the geographic location on which the facility was built; or

For an electric transmission facility constructed before April 9, 1975, within a width of three hundred fifty feet [106.68 meters] on either side of the centerline;

Except as provided in subdivision b, the activities do not affect any known exclusion or avoidance area;

The activities are for the construction:

Of a new electric energy conversion facility;

Of a new electric transmission facility;

To improve the existing electric energy conversion facility or electric transmission facility; or

To increase or decrease the capacity of the existing electric energy conversion facility or electric transmission facility; and

Before conducting any activities, the utility certifies in writing to the commission that:

The activities will not affect a known exclusion or avoidance area;

The activities are for the construction:

Of a new electric energy conversion facility;

Of a new electric transmission facility;

To improve the existing electric energy conversion or electric transmission facility; or

To increase or decrease the capacity of the existing electric energy conversion facility or electric transmission facility; and

The utility will comply with all applicable conditions and protections in siting laws and rules and commission orders previously issued for any part of the facility.

Otherwise qualifying for exclusion under subdivision a, except that the activities are expected to affect a known avoidance area and the utility before conducting any activities:

Certifies in writing to the commission that:

The activities will not affect a known exclusion area;

The activities are for the construction:

Of a new electric energy conversion facility;

Of a new electric transmission facility;

To improve the existing electric energy conversion facility or electric transmission facility; or

To increase or decrease the capacity of the existing electric energy conversion facility or electric transmission facility; and

The utility will comply with all applicable conditions and protections in siting laws and rules and commission orders previously issued for any part of the facility;

Notifies the commission in writing that the activities are expected to impact an avoidance area and provides information on the specific avoidance area expected to be impacted and the reasons why impact cannot be avoided; and

Receives the commission’s written approval for the impact to the avoidance area, based on a determination that there is no reasonable alternative to the expected impact. If the commission does not approve impacting the avoidance area, the utility must obtain siting authority under this chapter for the affected portion of the site or route. If the commission fails to act on the notification required by this subdivision within thirty days of the utility’s filing the notification, the impact to the avoidance area is deemed approved.

Incident to preliminary engineering or environmental studies.

“Corridor” means the area of land where a designated route may be established for an electric transmission facility.

“Electric energy conversion facility” means a plant, addition, or combination of plant and addition, designed for or capable of:

Generation by wind energy conversion exceeding one-half megawatt of electricity; or

Generation by any means other than wind energy conversion exceeding fifty megawatts of electricity.

“Electric transmission facility” means an electric transmission line and associated facilities with a design in excess of one hundred fifteen kilovolts. “Electric transmission facility” does not include:

A temporary electric transmission line loop that is:

Connected and adjacent to an existing electric transmission facility that was sited under this chapter;

Within the corridor of the sited facility and does not cross known exclusion or avoidance areas; and

In place for less than one year; or

An electric transmission line that is less than one mile [1.61 kilometers] long.

“Facility” means an electric energy conversion facility, electric transmission facility, or both.

“Permit” means the permit for the construction of an electric transmission facility within a designated corridor issued under this chapter.

“Person” includes an individual, firm, association, partnership, cooperative, corporation, limited liability company, or any department, agency, or instrumentality of a state or of the federal government, or any subdivision thereof.

“Power emergency” means an electric transmission line and associated facilities that have been damaged or destroyed by natural or manmade causes resulting in a loss of power supply to consumers of the power.

“Repower” means construction activities to completely or partially dismantle and replace turbine equipment at an existing wind energy conversion facility site that result in an increase of the facility’s generation output potential or turbine height. The term does not include routine turbine maintenance or routine replacement of malfunctioning turbines or turbine components.

“Route” means the location of an electric transmission facility within a designated corridor.

“Site” means the location of an electric energy conversion facility.

“Utility” means a person engaged in and controlling the electric generation, the transmission of electric energy, or the transmission of water from or to any electric energy conversion facility.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 436, § 3; 1977, ch. 447, § 1; 1979, ch. 504, § 2; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1993, ch. 341, § 5; 1997, ch. 401, § 1; 2005, ch. 403, § 1; 2009, ch. 404, § 2; 2009, ch. 406, § 1; 2011, ch. 348, § 1; 2013, ch. 365, § 1; 2015, ch. 326, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 327, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 328, § 6, effective July 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 389, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 346, § 1, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 347, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 326, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 365, S.L. 2013 became effective April 2, 2013, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 4 of ch. 365, S.L. 2013.

Note.

Section 49-22-03 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 1 of Chapter 347, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1096; and Section 1 of Chapter 346, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1095.

Note.

Section 49-22-03 was amended 2 times by the 2017 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 1 of Chapter 327, Session Laws 2017, Senate Bill 2286; and Section 6 of Chapter 328, Session Laws 2017, House Bill 1144.

Law Reviews.

North Dakota Law Review: Energy Symposium: Article: Minimizing Species Disputes In Energy Siting: Utilizing Natural Heritage Inventories, 87 N.D. L. Rev. 603 (2011).

49-22-04.
Ten-year plans — Contents.

Each utility that owns or operates, or plans within the next ten years to own, operate, or start construction on any facility shall develop a ten-year plan as specified in this section and submit the plan to the commission. Each utility shall file an updated plan on or before July first of each even-numbered year after the year of its initial submission. The ten-year plan may be appropriate portions of a single regional plan or may be jointly prepared and submitted by two or more utilities and must contain the following information:

A description of the general location, size, and type of all facilities to be owned or operated by the utility during the ensuing ten years, as well as those facilities to be removed from service during the ten-year period.

An identification of the location of the tentative preferred site for all electric energy conversion facilities and the tentative location of all electric transmission facilities on which construction is intended to be commenced within the ensuing five years and such other information as may be required by the commission. The site and corridor identification shall be made in compliance with the criteria published by the commission pursuant to section 49-22-05.1.

A description of the efforts by the utility to coordinate the plan with other utilities so as to provide a coordinated regional plan for meeting the utility needs of the region.

A description of the efforts to involve environmental protection and land-use planning agencies in the planning process, as well as other efforts to identify and minimize environmental problems at the earliest possible stage in the planning process.

A statement of the projected demand for the service rendered by the utility for the ensuing ten years and the underlying assumptions for the projection, with that information being as geographically specific as possible, and a description of the manner and extent to which the utility will meet the projected demands.

Any other relevant information as may be requested by the commission. Upon receipt of the ten-year plans the commission shall proceed to assess the impact of the development proposed within the state to ensure that energy conversion facilities and transmission facilities will be sited in an orderly manner compatible with environmental preservation and efficient use of resources.

If not previously disclosed in a ten-year plan filing pursuant to subdivision a of subsection 1, the utility owner or operator of an electric energy conversion facility shall notify the commission and the auditor of the county in which the facility is located if the owner or operator considers removing an electric energy conversion facility from service. Upon notice of the removal from service, the commission may request the owner or operator provide the commission with any applicable reliability study developed with a regional transmission organization in conjunction with the considered removal from service and may accept public comment in a format prescribed by the commission.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 436, § 4; 1977, ch. 447, § 2; 1995, ch. 454, § 1; 2013, ch. 363, § 1; 2015, ch. 327, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 328, § 7, effective July 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 348, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 327, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 363, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

49-22-05.
Inventory of potential sites — Criteria — Public hearings. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1977, ch. 447, § 16.

49-22-05.1.
Exclusion and avoidance areas — Criteria.

The commission shall develop criteria to be used in identifying exclusion and avoidance areas and to guide the site, corridor, and route suitability evaluation and designation process. The criteria also may include an identification of impacts and policies or practices which may be considered in the evaluation and designation process.

The commission may not identify prime farmland, unique farmland, or irrigated land as exclusion or avoidance areas when evaluating and designating geographical areas for site, corridor, or route suitability.

Except for electric transmission lines in existence before July 1, 1983, areas within five hundred feet [152.4 meters] of an inhabited rural residence must be designated avoidance areas. This criterion does not apply to a water pipeline. The five hundred foot [152.4 meter] avoidance area criteria for an inhabited rural residence may be waived by the owner of the inhabited rural residence in writing.

Areas less than one and one-tenth times the height of the turbine from the property line of a nonparticipating landowner and less than three times the height of the turbine or more from an inhabited rural residence of a nonparticipating landowner, must be excluded in the consideration of a site for a wind energy conversion area, unless a variance is granted. The commission may grant a variance if an authorized representative or agent of the permittee, the nonparticipating landowner, and affected parties with associated wind rights file a written agreement expressing the support of all parties for a variance to reduce the setback requirement in this subsection. A nonparticipating landowner is a landowner that has not signed a wind option or an easement agreement with the permittee of the wind energy conversion facility as defined in chapter 17-04. A local zoning authority may require setback distances greater than those required under this subsection. For purposes of this subsection, “height of the turbine” means the distance from the base of the wind turbine to the turbine blade tip when it is in its highest position.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 447, § 3; 1979, ch. 504, § 3; 1983, ch. 521, § 1; 1995, ch. 454, § 2; 2017, ch. 328, § 8, effective July 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 63, § 3, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 56, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.

Note.

Section 49-22-05.1 was amended 2 times by the 2017 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 3 of Chapter 63, Session Laws 2017, Senate Bill 2313; and Section 8 of Chapter 328, Session Laws 2017, House Bill 1144.

Section 5 of chapter 63, S.L. 2017 provides, “

APPLICATION.

Section 3 of this Act applies only to projects that receive a certificate of site compatibility after August 1, 2017.”

49-22-06.
Facility development plans. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1977, ch. 447, § 16.

49-22-07.
Certificate of site compatibility or route permit required.

A utility may not begin construction of an electric energy conversion facility or an electric transmission facility in the state without first having obtained a certificate of site compatibility or a route permit from the commission pursuant to this chapter. The facility must be constructed, operated, and maintained in conformity with the certificate or permit and any terms, conditions, or modifications of the certificate or permit. A certificate or permit may be transferred, subject to the approval of the commission, to any person who agrees to comply with its terms, conditions, and modifications.

If a power emergency exists which necessitates the relocation of a portion of an electric transmission line and associated facilities from the designated route, the owner of the line shall give telephonic notice to the commission in advance of the relocation. The line may then be relocated to restore power as soon as practicable. After the line has been relocated, the owner shall file with the commission a request to approve the relocated route.

A wind energy conversion facility that has not been issued a certificate of site compatibility and exceeds five megawatts of electricity may not repower the wind energy conversion facility without first having obtained a certificate of site compatibility. A variance may be granted for impacts to exclusion and avoidance areas resulting from the repowering of existing infrastructure upon a showing of good cause. A requested variance must comply with local land use, zoning, building rules, regulations, and ordinances.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 436, § 7; 1977, ch. 447, § 4; 1979, ch. 504, § 4; 1997, ch. 401, § 2; 2013, ch. 364, § 2; 2017, ch. 328, § 9, effective July 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 346, § 2, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 364, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

Cross-References.

Southwest pipeline project exempt, see N.D.C.C. § 61-24.3-03.

49-22-07.1.
Letter of intent prior to construction. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 365, § 3.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by section 3 of chapter 365, S.L. 2013 became effective April 2, 2013, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 4, ch. 365, S.L. 2013.

49-22-07.2.
Waiver of procedures and time schedules.

Any utility which proposes to construct an electric energy conversion facility or an electric transmission facility within the state may make an application to the commission for a waiver of any of the procedures or time schedules set forth in this chapter or in the rules adopted pursuant to this chapter. The commission, upon a finding that the proposed facility is of such length, design, location, or purpose that it will produce minimal adverse effects, or, upon a finding that a demonstrable emergency exists, may issue an order waiving specified procedures and time schedules required by this chapter or by the rules adopted pursuant to this chapter, including, but not limited to, applications, notices, and hearings, and may forthwith issue a certificate of site compatibility, a certificate of corridor compatibility, or a route permit, with such conditions as the commission may require.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 447, § 6; 1979, ch. 504, § 5; 2017, ch. 328, § 10, effective July 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 347, § 2, effective August 1, 2021.

49-22-08.
Application for a certificate — Notice of filing — Amendment — Designation of a site or corridor.

An application for a certificate must be in such form as the commission may prescribe, containing the following information:

A description of the size and type of facility.

A summary of any studies which have been made of the environmental impact of the facility.

A statement explaining the need for the facility.

An identification of the location of the preferred site for any electric energy conversion facility.

An identification of the location of the preferred corridor for any electric transmission facility.

A description of the merits and detriments of any location identified and a comprehensive analysis with supporting data showing the reasons why the preferred location is best suited for the facility.

A description of mitigative measures that will be taken to minimize all foreseen adverse impacts resulting from the location, construction, and operation of the proposed facility.

An evaluation of the proposed site or corridor with regard to the applicable considerations set out in section 49-22-09 and the criteria established pursuant to section 49-22-05.1.

Such other information as the applicant may consider relevant or the commission may require.

After determining that the application is complete, the commission shall serve a notice of filing of the application on such persons and agencies that the commission may deem appropriate and shall publish a notice of filing of the application in the official newspaper of each county in which any portion of the site or corridor is proposed to be located.

A copy of the application shall be furnished to any person or agency, upon request to the commission within thirty days of either service or publication of the notice of filing.

Within thirty days following service of the notice of filing of a complete application by the commission, the applicant shall provide a copy of the commission’s notice of filing of the application by first-class mail to the owner of record of any land located within the requested site or corridor. For purposes of this subsection, the owner of record means the owner identified by the county treasurer to receive the real estate tax statement.

An application for an amendment of a certificate shall be in such form and contain such information as the commission shall prescribe.

The commission may designate a site or corridor for a proposed facility following the study and hearings provided for in this chapter. Any designation shall be made in accordance with the evidence presented at the hearings, an evaluation of the information provided in the application, the criteria established pursuant to section 49-22-05.1, and the considerations set out in section 49-22-09 in a finding with reasons for the designation, and shall be made in a timely manner no later than six months after the filing of a completed application for a certificate of site compatibility or no later than three months after the filing of a completed application for a certificate of corridor compatibility. The time for designation of a site or corridor may be extended by the commission for just cause. The failure of the commission to act within the time limits provided in this section shall not operate to divest the commission of jurisdiction in any certification proceeding. The commission shall indicate the reasons for any refusal of designation. Upon designation of a site or corridor, the commission shall issue a certificate of site compatibility or a certificate of corridor compatibility with such terms, conditions, or modifications deemed necessary. The commission may not condition the issuance of a certificate or permit on the applicant providing a mitigation payment assessed or requested by another state agency or entity to offset a negative impact on wildlife habitat.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 436, § 8; 1977, ch. 447, § 7; 1979, ch. 504, § 6; 1981, ch. 481, § 1; 2017, ch. 328, § 11, effective July 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 390, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 349, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 2 of chapter 349, S.L. 2021, provides, “

APPLICATION.

This Act applies to a siting application filed after August 31, 2021.”

49-22-08.1.
Application for a permit — Notice of filing — Amendment — Designation of a route.

An application for a route permit for an electric transmission facility within a designated corridor must be filed no later than two years after the issuance of the certificate and must be in such form as the commission may prescribe, containing the following information:

A description of the type, size, and design of the proposed facility.

A description of the location of the proposed facility.

An evaluation of the proposed route with regard to the applicable considerations set out in section 49-22-09 and the criteria established pursuant to section 49-22-05.1.

A description of mitigative measures that will be taken to minimize all foreseen adverse impacts resulting from the location, construction, and operation of the proposed facility.

A description of the right-of-way preparation and construction and reclamation procedures.

A statement setting forth the manner in which:

The utility will inform affected landowners of easement acquisition, and necessary easement conditions and restrictions.

The utility will compensate landowners for easements, without reference to the actual consideration to be paid.

Such other information as the utility may consider relevant or the commission may require.

After determining that the application is complete, the commission shall serve a notice of filing of the application on such persons and agencies that the commission may deem appropriate and shall publish a notice of filing of the application in the official newspaper of each county in which any portion of the designated corridor is located.

A copy of the application shall be furnished to any person or agency, upon request to the commission within thirty days of either service or publication of the notice of filing.

An application for an amendment of a permit shall be in such form and contain such information as the commission shall prescribe.

The commission shall designate a route for the construction of an electric transmission facility following the study and hearings provided for in this chapter. This designation shall be made in accordance with the evidence presented at the hearings, an evaluation of the information provided in the application, the criteria established pursuant to section 49-22-05.1, and the considerations set out in section 49-22-09 in a finding with reasons for the designation, and shall be made in a timely manner no later than six months after the filing of a completed application. The time for designation of a route may be extended by the commission for just cause. The failure of the commission to act within the time limit provided in this section shall not operate to divest the commission of jurisdiction in any permit proceeding. Upon designation of a route the commission shall issue a permit to the applicant with such terms, conditions, or modifications deemed necessary.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 504, § 7; 2017, ch. 328, § 12, effective July 1, 2017.

49-22-08.2.
Combining application.

A utility may file a separate application for a certificate or a permit, or combined into one application.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 328, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

49-22-09.
Factors to be considered in evaluating applications and designation of sites, corridors, and routes.

The commission shall be guided by, but is not limited to, the following considerations, where applicable, to aid the evaluation and designation of sites, corridors, and routes:

Available research and investigations relating to the effects of the location, construction, and operation of the proposed facility on public health and welfare, natural resources, and the environment.

The effects of new electric energy conversion and electric transmission technologies and systems designed to minimize adverse environmental effects.

The potential for beneficial uses of waste energy from a proposed electric energy conversion facility.

Adverse direct and indirect environmental effects that cannot be avoided should the proposed site or route be designated.

Alternatives to the proposed site, corridor, or route which are developed during the hearing process and which minimize adverse effects.

Irreversible and irretrievable commitments of natural resources should the proposed site, corridor, or route be designated.

The direct and indirect economic impacts of the proposed facility.

Existing plans of the state, local government, and private entities for other developments at or in the vicinity of the proposed site, corridor, or route.

The effect of the proposed site or route on existing scenic areas, historic sites and structures, and paleontological or archaeological sites.

The effect of the proposed site or route on areas unique because of biological wealth or because the areas are habitats for rare and endangered species.

Problems raised by federal agencies, other state agencies, and local entities.

The commission may not condition the issuance of a certificate or permit on the applicant providing a mitigation payment assessed or requested by another state agency or entity to offset a negative impact on wildlife habitat.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 436, § 9; 1979, ch. 504, § 8; 2017, ch. 328, § 14, effective July 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 56, § 4, effective July 1, 2019.

49-22-09.1.
Approval of hydroelectric transmission facilities by legislative assembly required.

After compliance with the applicable requirements of this chapter, any hydroelectric transmission facility that transmits hydroelectric power produced outside the United States, and which crosses any portion of this state, must have the approval of the legislative assembly by concurrent resolution. A person may not begin construction of a hydroelectric transmission facility in this state which transmits hydroelectric power produced outside the United States, or exercise the right of eminent domain in connection with such construction, without first having complied with this chapter and obtained the approval of the legislative assembly. This section does not apply to any electric transmission facility for which a route permit and certificate of corridor compatibility has been issued prior to July 1, 1985, or any extension thereof issued after July 1, 1985.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 516, § 1; 2017, ch. 328, § 15, effective July 1, 2017.

49-22-09.2.
Mitigating direct environmental impacts.

An applicant may elect to provide payment to mitigate any assessed adverse direct environmental impacts of a proposed site, corridor, route, or facility. The applicant may elect to provide the payment to the agriculture commissioner.

The agriculture commissioner shall deposit any moneys paid to mitigate the adverse environmental impacts of a proposed site, corridor, route, or facility as follows:

Fifty percent into the environmental impact mitigation fund; and

Fifty percent into the federal environmental law impact review fund.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 56, § 5, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 350, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

49-22-10.
Designation of sites and corridors. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1979, ch. 504, § 15.

49-22-11.
Approval of a specific transmission facility route within a designated corridor. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1979, ch. 504, § 15.

49-22-12.
Emergency certification. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1977, ch. 447, § 16.

49-22-12.1.
Emergency certification. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1979, ch. 504, § 15.

49-22-13.
Public hearings — Notice.

The commission shall hold a public hearing in each county in which any portion of a site, corridor, or route is proposed to be located in an application for a certificate or a permit. If the commission determines there is an emergency that would prevent an in-person hearing in the county in which any portion of a site, corridor, or route is proposed, a remote public hearing may be held. At the public hearing, any person may present testimony or evidence relating to the information provided in the application, the criteria developed pursuant to section 49-22-05.1, and the factors to be considered pursuant to section 49-22-09. If the commission determines there are no adequate facilities to conduct a public hearing within the county in which any portion of a site, corridor, or route is proposed to be located in, the public hearing must be held in the nearest adequate location. When more than one county is involved, the commission may hold a consolidated hearing in one or more of the affected counties. A hearing for any county shall not be consolidated if five or more affected landowners in such county file a petition with the commission within ten days of the publication of the notice of hearing.

The commission shall not be required to hold a public hearing on an application for the transfer of a certificate or a permit, or an application for a waiver of procedures and time schedules, but shall publish a notice of opportunity for a public hearing in the official newspaper of each county in which any portion of the facility or the proposed site, corridor, or route is located. If requested by any interested person and good cause has been shown therefor, the commission shall hold a public hearing. Where more than one county is involved, the commission may hold a consolidated hearing in one or more of the affected counties.

One or more public hearings shall be held at a location or locations determined by the commission concerning the following matters:

A substantial or material change in the criteria established pursuant to section 49-22-05.1.

A substantial or material change in the rules adopted pursuant to section 49-22-18.

The revocation or suspension of a certificate or permit.

Notice of a public hearing shall be given by the commission by service on such persons and agencies that the commission may deem appropriate and twice by publication, once at least twenty days prior to such hearing and a second time within twenty days prior to such hearing. Notice of a public hearing and notice of opportunity for a public hearing on an application for a certificate, a permit, a transfer or amendment of a certificate or permit, or a waiver shall be given at the expense of the applicant. In an emergency the commission, in its discretion, may notice a hearing upon less than twenty days.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 436, § 13; 1977, ch. 447, § 11; 1979, ch. 504, § 9; 1981, ch. 481, § 2; 1981, ch. 482, § 1; 2021, ch. 347, § 3, effective August 1, 2021.

49-22-14.
Advisory committees — Appointment — Compensation.

The commission may appoint one or more advisory committees to assist it in carrying out its duties under this chapter. Committees appointed to evaluate sites or corridors considered for designation must be composed of as many persons as may be appointed by the commission, but must include a majority of public representatives; at least one representative from the state department of agriculture, a public or municipally owned utility, a private investor-owned utility, and a cooperatively owned utility; and one representative from each county and city in which an electric energy conversion facility or electric transmission facility is proposed to be located. Members of advisory committees are entitled to be reimbursed, within the limits of legislative appropriations, for any necessary expenses in the amounts provided by law for state officials.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 436, § 14; 2017, ch. 328, § 16, effective July 1, 2017.

Cross-References.

Advances for travel expenses, see N.D.C.C. § 44-08-04.2.

Claims for travel expenses, see N.D.C.C. § 44-08-04.

Limitation on claims for travel expenses, see N.D.C.C. § 44-08-03.

Mileage and travel expenses of state officers and employees, see N.D.C.C. § 54-06-09.

Per diem allowance for long-term travel, see N.D.C.C. § 44-08-04.1.

49-22-14.1.
Cooperation with state and federal agencies.

The commission may, and is encouraged to, cooperate with and receive and exchange technical information and assistance from and with any department, agency, or officer of any state or of the federal government to eliminate duplication of effort, to establish a common database, or for any other purpose relating to the provisions of this chapter and in furtherance of the statement of policy contained herein.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 447, § 12; 1979, ch. 504, § 10; 2017, ch. 327, § 2, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 389, § 2, effective August 1, 2019.

Law Reviews.

North Dakota Law Review: Energy Symposium: Article: Minimizing Species Disputes In Energy Siting: Utilizing Natural Heritage Inventories, 87 N.D. L. Rev. 603 (2011).

49-22-15.
Public participation — Meetings — Records. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1979, ch. 504, § 15.